California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31010.

(a) There is hereby imposed a seismic retrofit surcharge equal to one dollar ($1) per vehicle for passage on the Bay Area state-owned toll bridges, except for vehicles that are authorized toll-free passage on these bridges.

(b) Funds generated pursuant to subdivision (a) that are in excess of those needed to meet the toll commitment as specified by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 188.5 shall be available to the authority for funding, consistent with Sections 30913 and 30914, the purposes and projects described in those sections.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), funds generated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid to the authority directly and deposited in the Bay Area Toll Account pursuant to Section 30950.2 and shall constitute revenues of the tolls imposed on the bridges described in Section 30910 for all purposes of Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 30950).

(d) Funds generated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used exclusively to repay obligations issued by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank and secured by the surcharge imposed by subdivision (a) until they are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations. This subdivision shall become inoperative when the obligations are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations.

(e) The department may increase the amount of the seismic retrofit surcharge identified in subdivision (a) for debt service purposes only on the obligations issued by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070) and only for as long as those obligations are outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations, if circumstances exist that have resulted in a reduction in the funds generated by subdivision (a) so as to jeopardize the payment of debt service on those obligations. This subdivision shall become inoperative when those obligations are no longer outstanding due to their retirement or defeasance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 15.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31011.

(a) The authority may increase the amount of the surcharge described in Section 31010 for the purpose of completing the state toll bridge seismic program described in Section 188.5 and to meet its obligations under the act adding this section in the 2005–06 Regular Session. No increase shall be made effective prior to January 1, 2007.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, revenues generated by an increase imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Bay Area Toll Account.

(c) The authority shall hold at least two public meetings at least 45 days before taking any action pursuant to subdivision (a) to increase the amount of the surcharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 515, Sec. 8.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31015.

(a) Revenues generated from the surcharge shall not exceed nine hundred seven million dollars ($907,000,000), unless any of the following occurs:

(1) After completing 30 percent of the design, and after completion of a cost estimate by the department, the authority selects a design that costs more than the cost of a single tower cable suspension bridge selected by the department.

(2) The authority requests funding for the replacement or relocation of the transbay bus terminal in the City and County of San Francisco.

(3) The authority requests funding for a bicycle or pedestrian access that is to be added to either the new east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge or the retrofitted west span of that bridge, or both.

(b) If the authority does any of the things listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the local share of the project costs shall be increased by an amount equal to any additional costs that are incurred as a result of the authority’s decision.

(c) The department shall include the amenities requested by the authority only if sufficient funds generated by the seismic retrofit surcharge are made available to fully pay for those amenities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

31020.

Notwithstanding Section 30953, as amended by the act adding this section in the 2005–06 Regular Session, revenue generated from the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010 shall be deposited in the account until obligations secured by that seismic retrofit surcharge and issued by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070) are no longer outstanding as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations. After obligations of the bank secured by toll funds are no longer outstanding, all toll revenues generated from bridges in the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall be deposited in the Bay Area Toll Account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 18.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31021.

Projects in the state toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement program described in Section 188.5 are not subject to administrative overhead cost assessments by the department because they are within the duties described in Section 30952.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 19.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.6. State-Owned Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Financing Act of 2001 [31070. - 31073.]

31070.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Following the 1989 Loma Prieta earthquake, legislation was enacted to make seismic safety a top transportation priority in this state. In the wake of the Northridge earthquake of 1994, when nine major freeway bridges were destroyed and 11 major highways wee closed, seismic retrofit of the state’s bridges and highways again became the number one priority on the state’s transportation agenda.

(b) In 1996, voters approved Proposition 192, a two billion dollar ($2,000,000,000) bond measure for state highway seismic retrofit. This funding measure includes the costs of retrofitting seven state-owned toll bridges, five in the San Francisco-Oakland Bay area and two in southern California. Replacement costs for the eastern span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge were factored in as well.

(c) Subsequent to the adoption of Proposition 192, new cost estimates by the department increase the toll bridge retrofit program from six hundred fifty million dollars ($650,000,000) to two billion six hundred million dollars ($2,600,000,000). To address this increase, the Legislature enacted legislation in 1997, establishing the compromise of a 50/50 funding agreement between the state and local toll payers to finance all state-owned bridges in the San Francisco-Oakland Bay area, Los Angeles, and San Diego.

(d) It is the further intent of the Legislature that the department address the funding deficiency through a combination of financing options. These options may or may not include obtaining a loan under the federal Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998 (P.L. 105-178), a program authorized by the Congress of the United States in 1998 to provided credit assistance for large transportation projects.

(e) Other financing options include revenue bonds and commercial paper should be issued under the authority of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Financing Bank, the California Transportation Commission, or other, appropriate entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31070.5.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Authority” means the Bay Area Toll Authority established under Section 30950.

(b) “Account” means the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account established in the State Transportation Fund under Section 188.12.

(c) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank established under Section 63021 of the Government Code.

(d) “Bay area bridges” means the state-owned toll bridges in the region within the area of the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(e) “Bonds” has the meaning defined in subdivision (e) of Section 63010 of the Government Code.

(f) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(g) “TIFIA” means the federal Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998 (P.L. 105-178).

(h) “Toll surcharge” means the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed under Section 31010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31070.7.

The department has full and sole responsibility for completion of all seismic retrofit projects on the bay area bridges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31071.

(a) The department may enter into financing agreements with the bank for the purpose of borrowing funds to finance or refinance the seismic retrofit project costs identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 188.5. The bank may issue bonds for this purpose, pursuant to the authority granted to it under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 63070) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code, and deposit the proceeds from the bonds into the account. The amount of borrowing may be increased to fund necessary reserves, capitalized interest, interim bonds, including, but not limited to, commercial paper, costs of issuance, and administrative, financial, legal, and incidental services related to the bonds. The department shall pursue the most cost-effective and efficient financing plan for the bridge work identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 188.5.

(b) To the extent provided in the governing documents, each of the bonds issued under this section shall be payable from, and secured by, all or a portion of the toll surcharge revenue in the account and the assets in that account.

(c) Prior to the issuance of bonds payable from the toll surcharge, the bank shall confirm that bonds issued under Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 30950) shall not be impaired solely by action taken under this section, as evidenced by confirmation of the then existing ratings on these bonds, by the rating agencies then rating the bonds. This requirement shall not apply if the voters approve an increase in the toll rate pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30921.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 341.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31071.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during the construction period, all revenues generated from the toll surcharge shall be available to the department only for the construction and financing purposes of the toll bridge seismic retrofit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31071.5.

(a) Bonds issued under this chapter may not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the bank, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, but shall be payable solely from the account, and the assets of the account, and the security provided by the account. All bonds issued under this chapter shall contain on the face of the bonds a statement to this effect.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Article 3 (commencing with Section 63040) of, Article 4 (commencing with 63042) of, and Article 5 (commencing with Section 63043) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code do not apply to any financing provided by the bank to, or at the request of, the department in connection with the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31072.

Any federal funds received by the department as a direct loan or line of credit under TIFIA are hereby appropriated to the department for transfer to the account for the purposes of that account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31073.

The department may make the loans and transfers authorized under Section 14556.7 of the Government Code and Section 188.14 to provide adequate cash flow for obligation service requirements resulting from the financing authority provided under Sections 31071 and 31072.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. El Dorado County Toll Tunnel Authority Act [31100. - 31246.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [31100. - 31105.]

31100.

This chapter may be cited as the El Dorado County Toll Tunnel Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires the general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31102.

“Authority” means the El Dorado County Toll Tunnel Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31103.

“Toll tunnel” means the tunnel from U.S. Highway 50 in the vicinity of Twin Bridges to U.S. Highway 50 in the vicinity of Meyers which the authority is authorized to finance, construct, operate, and maintain as a toll facility pursuant to this chapter, and includes all appurtenances and additions, alterations or improvements thereto or replacements thereof, and the approaches to each end thereof, including any necessary connections with U.S. Highway 50, all lands and interest therein used therefor, and buildings and improvements thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.

“Bond” means any written evidence of indebtedness which the authority may issue pursuant to this chapter in order to secure funds with which to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the state from making appropriations from time to time in aid of the construction pursuant to this chapter of the toll tunnel or property, franchises, or rights appurtenant thereto or for the purpose of making preliminary surveys, plans, and estimates of the cost thereof, and meeting other preliminary expenses as the Legislature deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization of the Authority [31110. - 31115.]

31110.

The El Dorado County Toll Tunnel Authority is hereby created. The authority shall be governed by a board consisting of the members of the Board of Supervisors of El Dorado County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31111.

All of the members of the authority shall serve thereon without compensation, but they shall receive their necessary actual traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31112.

A majority of the members of the authority may act for the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31113.

The authority may employ a secretary, a treasurer, an attorney, a chief engineer, and such other persons as are necessary to enable it properly to perform the duties imposed upon it by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31114.

The authority may sue and be sued in the name of the El Dorado County Toll Tunnel Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31115.

The authority shall select one of its members to serve as chairman of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Powers and Duties of the Authority [31120. - 31132.]

31120.

The authority may study the feasibility of, plan, design, finance, construct, operate, and maintain a tunnel from U.S. Highway 50 in the vicinity of Twin Bridges to U.S. Highway 50 in the vicinity of Meyers.

The authority shall require that any tunnel constructed shall meet state highway standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31121.

The authority shall fix the rates of toll and other charges for the toll tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31122.

The authority in establishing toll charges shall give consideration to the cost of operating and maintaining the toll tunnel, including the cost of insurance, and to the amount required annually to meet the redemption of bonds and interest payments thereon. At all times the tolls and charges shall be fixed at rates to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and maintenance expenses, including insurance costs, and all redemption payments and interest charges of the bonds issued for the toll tunnel as they fall due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31123.

Toll charges so fixed may be changed from time to time as conditions warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31124.

The authority may do such acts and make such agreements not inconsistent with laws as are necessary or desirable in connection with the duties and powers conferred upon it by law regarding the construction, maintenance, operation, and insurance of the toll tunnel or the safeguarding of the funds and revenues required for such purposes and the payment of the indebtedness incurred therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31125.

The authority, through such engineers or experts as it may employ, shall design the toll tunnel, and may build it or any portions of it either by its own employees or by contract with any person. The cost of the toll tunnel shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, or from contributions or appropriations from other sources as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31126.

The authority shall keep full, complete, and separate accounts of the toll tunnel and annually shall prepare balance sheets and income and profit and loss statements showing the financial condition of the toll tunnel. The statements shall be open to the inspection of holders of bonds issued by the authority at all reasonable times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31127.

The authority may issue permits for the use of the toll tunnel on a credit basis. The holder of such a permit shall furnish to and maintain in force with the authority a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, in an amount equal to twice the authority’s estimate of the toll charges to be incurred under such permit during one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

31128.

The authority may revoke any permit granted for failure of the holder to comply with its terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

31129.

The authority may also require the holder of any such permit to pay a fee of not to exceed five dollars ($5) a month to cover printing and other overhead expense, the proceeds thereof to be deposited in the fund from which such expenses are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31130.

When necessary to facilitate movement of traffic, the authority may limit the use of the toll tunnel on a credit basis to particular classes of vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31131.

The authority may adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the Vehicle Code for the control of traffic in the toll tunnel, to aid and insure the safe and orderly flow of traffic, and shall so far as practicable notify the public of such rules and regulations by signs placed along the route of the toll tunnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31132.

The California Highway Patrol shall have the authority and it shall be its duty to provide for proper and adequate policing of the toll tunnel, to insure the enforcement thereon of the Vehicle Code and rules and regulations adopted by the authority pursuant to Section 31131, and to cooperate with the authority, to the end that the toll tunnel be operated at all times in such a manner as to carry traffic efficiently.

All required accident and supplemental reports, and all other reports made to the California Highway Patrol by any peace officer or employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles relative to accidents and incidents occurring on property of the authority shall be immediately available for the confidential use of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds [31140. - 31175.]

31140.

Whenever the authority determines that it is for the best interests of the public highways in the state that the toll tunnel be constructed and operated by the authority, based upon preliminary estimates of the cost of construction thereof, an estimate of the amount required to be raised for that purpose by the issuance of revenue bonds, and a statement of the probable amount of money, property, materials, or labor to be contributed from other sources in aid of the construction prepared by its staff, it shall adopt a resolution declaring that public interest and necessity require the construction of the toll tunnel and authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds for the purpose of obtaining funds in an amount not in excess of that estimated to be required for the construction thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31141.

All bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be issued in the name of the authority and shall constitute obligations of the authority only. Such bonds shall be identified as toll tunnel bonds and shall contain a recital on the face thereof that the payment or redemption of the bonds and the payment of the interest thereon is secured by a direct and exclusive charge and lien upon the tolls and other revenues of any nature whatever received from the operation of the toll tunnel, and that neither the payment of the principal or any part thereof or any interest thereon, constitutes a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of El Dorado County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.

The authority shall determine the form, conditions, and denominations of all bonds, the dates which the bonds to be sold shall bear, and the interest rate thereon which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum. The rate of interest need not be uniform for all bonds of the same authorized issue. Principal and interest of the bonds shall be payable at such places as are fixed and determined by the authority. The bonds may contain provisions for registration as to principal only and as to both principal and interest. The bonds shall be issued in coupon form with interest payable at such times as are determined by the authority, and shall mature at such times and in such amounts as the authority prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.

The authority may provide for the retirement of the bonds at any time or times prior to their maturity, in such manner and upon payment of such premiums as may be fixed and determined in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds and referred to therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.

All bonds shall be signed by the treasurer and countersigned by the chairman. The signatures of the treasurer and the chairman may be by facsimile, but said bonds shall be authenticated by such signatures as the bond resolution or indenture may require. All interest coupons shall bear the facsimile signature of the treasurer. In case any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to hold his office before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31145.

All revenue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter may be issued and sold by the authority from time to time and in such amounts as the authority deems necessary to provide sufficient funds for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized, including the payment of interest on the bonds during the period of actual construction, and for a period of six months thereafter, and the proceeds thereof are available for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31146.

Bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter may be sold below the par or face value thereof, but the sale price shall not be less than that which will yield the purchaser 6 percent a year according to standard tables of bond values, and shall include the interest which has accrued thereon up to the date of delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31147.

Successive issues of bonds within the limits of the original authorization for the issuance of bonds for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel shall have equal preference with respect to the redemption thereof and the payment of interest thereon, but the authority may fix different maturity dates, serially or otherwise, for successive issues under any one original authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31148.

All bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be sold on sealed proposals to the highest and best bidder after such advertising for bids as the authority deems proper. The authority may reject any and all bids submitted and may thereafter sell the bonds so advertised for sale at private sale under such terms and conditions as it deems most advantageous to its own interest, but the bonds shall not be sold at a price below that of the best bid which was rejected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31149.

Temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, signed by the treasurer, of any denomination whatever and with or without coupons attached thereto, may be issued and delivered until the definitive bonds are executed and available for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31150.

The purchase price of all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the treasurer for the account of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31151.

The authority may include in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter which limit, restrict, or regulate the holding, deposit, investment, and application of money consisting of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds or the tolls and other revenues received from the operation of the toll tunnel, and such provisions shall constitute a contract with the holders of the bonds and be binding upon the authority as long as the bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31152.

The authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds for the setting up of one or more reserve funds out of the proceeds of the bonds or out of the tolls and other revenues not needed for the payment of interest on the bonds and the principal of the bonds as they currently mature, and for the preservation and continuance thereof in a manner to be provided therein, and may also require the immediate application of all surplus money in any such toll revenue fund to the retirement, by call or purchase, of the bonds prior to maturity in such manner and upon such terms and the payment of such premiums as the authority deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31153.

The authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds, or may otherwise agree with the purchasers of bonds, regarding the deposit of all money constituting the Acquisition and Construction Fund and the Toll Revenue Fund, and may provide for the deposit of such money at such times, with such depositaries or paying agents, and upon the furnishing of such security as may meet with the approval of the purchasers of the bonds. The depositaries and security provided for or agreed upon, however, shall be qualified and eligible in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31154.

The authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds for the carrying of insurance as authorized by this chapter, and the purchase and carrying of such insurance shall thereupon be obligatory upon the authority and be paid for out of the Toll Revenue Fund as may be specified in the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31155.

Whenever any bonds are to be issued pursuant to this chapter, the authority, from time to time, upon such terms and conditions in all respects as it approves and consistently with this chapter, may enter into indentures or agreements containing any or all of the following provisions:

(a) Providing for the amount, form, maturities, registration, and transfer and interchange of the bonds and coupons and the terms and conditions upon which they shall be issued, sold, paid, retired, funded, and refunded.

(b) Providing for a sinking fund for the bonds and designating a trustee or trustees, which shall be a bank or trust company or banks or trust companies duly qualified to do business in this state, to receive and disburse the revenues of the toll bridge works or improvement.

(c) Providing that as long as any of such bonds are outstanding there shall be raised in each year by tolls not less than the minimum amounts required for interest, sinking fund, redemption, and reserve requirements for the bonds, in addition to the amount needed for current operating and maintenance expenses, including insurance costs, required to be paid from such sources.

(d) Such other provisions for the protection of the holders of the bonds as the authority approves including, without limiting (a), (b), or (c), provisions that in the event of refusal or failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or any other applicable law, or of any agreement made with the holders of the bonds or of any issue thereof, the holders of a stated percentage in aggregate principal amount of the bonds, or of such issue thereof as the case may be, then outstanding may, in accordance with such appropriate procedure as is provided in the agreement or indenture, appoint a trustee to represent all the holders of the bonds, or all the holders of the issue thereof as the case may be, in the matter of exercising and prosecuting on their behalf such rights and remedies as are available to them under the law. The authority shall in its absolute discretion fix the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees shall receive, hold and disburse the revenues and may prescribe the powers and duties of the trustee or trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31156.

All benefits conferred or obligations imposed by this chapter or by any other law with respect to making provision for the payment, whether from tolls or other revenues received from the use and operation of the toll tunnel or from other sources, of expenses in connection with the operation, maintenance, and insurance of, and the construction of approaches to, the toll tunnel, shall, notwithstanding the retirement or discharge of any or all of the bonds issued by the authority for the purpose of constructing the toll tunnel, inure to and continue for the benefit of any other bonds issued pursuant to this chapter as additional to, or funding, or refunding the bonds originally issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31157.

The authority may contract loans and borrow money through the sale of bonds of the same character as those authorized pursuant to this chapter, from the United States or any of its departments, agencies, or instrumentalities upon such conditions and terms as may be agreed to. Such bonds shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter except the requirement that bonds be first offered at public sale pursuant to advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31158.

If a bond issue for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel is authorized and sold in whole or in part and the authority deems it advisable and advantageous to enlarge or extend the toll tunnel or to change the structure or design thereof in order to afford new or greater facilities for any type or class of traffic, the authority may issue additional bonds for the purpose of enlarging or extending the toll tunnel or changing the structure or design thereof in order to afford such new or greater facilities. Such additional bonds shall be issued only if the surrender and cancellation of all outstanding bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel as originally designed can be assured or obtained by call or by consent of the holders thereof. Such additional bonds shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the state or of El Dorado County but shall be bonds of the authority of the same character and payable from the same funds as other bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter. The pledge of the tolls and other revenues to be received from the operation of the toll tunnel to the payment of outstanding bonds shall not be lessened, diminished, or affected in any way by the issuance of such additional bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31159.

If the outstanding bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of the toll tunnel as originally designed are, at the time of issuance of the additional bonds, by their terms subject to immediate retirement before maturity at the option of the authority, or if the holders consent to the retirement of such bonds, the authority may include in the issue of bonds to be sold for the purpose of enlarging or extending the toll tunnel or changing the design thereof, an amount of bonds sufficient to produce funds with which to retire the outstanding bonds according to their terms. Before any such additional bonds are delivered the authority shall first duly call the outstanding bonds for redemption in accordance with their terms and conditions or obtain the consent of the holders thereof to their retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31160.

Out of the proceeds derived from the sale of any such additional bonds there shall be set aside an amount of money sufficient to retire such outstanding bonds as may be thereafter presented for payment. Bonds of the new authorized issue may be delivered in part in exchange for a like principal amount of outstanding bonds of the original issue if the holders of the outstanding bonds to be exchanged consent thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31161.

All provisions of this chapter apply with like force and effect to the issuance of any bonds of the new authorized issue, and the holders thereof are subrogated to all the rights and powers of the holders of the bonds which are surrendered in exchange therefor, except as such rights and powers are modified by the express terms of the bonds of the new authorized issue or the proceedings authorizing their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31162.

Whenever bonds of any kind have been issued and are outstanding pursuant to this chapter, the authority may from time to time or at one time issue and sell or exchange funding or refunding bonds for the purpose of retiring, paying, funding, or refunding either all or such part of the outstanding bonds or of one or more issues or series thereof, as it deems advisable. Such funding or refunding bonds shall be issued and delivered only when the issue or series of bonds to be funded or refunded have matured, are about to mature, are subject to retirement before maturity, or if the outstanding bonds are not subject to retirement, the retirement thereof has been assured or obtained by consent of the holders thereof. Funding or refunding bonds may be delivered wholly or in part in exchange for outstanding bonds to be funded or refunded thereby, if the holders of the outstanding bonds to be exchanged consent thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31163.

Funding or refunding bonds shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the state or of El Dorado County, but shall be bonds of the authority of the same character and payable from the same funds as other bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter. Any and all reserve or other funds applicable to the payment of the bonds funded or refunded, may, if so directed by the authority, be transferred to any reserve or other funds provided with respect to the funding or refunding bonds. The pledge of the tolls and other revenues to be received from the operation of the toll tunnel to the payment of outstanding bonds shall not be lessened, diminished, or affected in any way by the issuance of such funding or refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

31164.
